Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-3516
Homestead; exemption; application; county assessor; duties.

The county assessor shall examine each application for homestead exemption filed with him or her for an exemption pursuant to section 77-3506, 77-3507, or 77-3508 and shall determine, except for the income requirements, whether or not such application should be approved or rejected. If the application is approved, the county assessor shall mark the same approved and sign the application. In case he or she finds that the exemption should not be allowed by reason of not being in conformity to law, the county assessor shall mark the application rejected, state thereon the reason for such rejection, and sign the application. In any case when the county assessor rejects an application for exemption, he or she shall notify the applicant of such action by mailing written notice to the applicant at the address shown in the application within ten days after the application is rejected. The notice shall be on forms prescribed by the Tax Commissioner.

Laws 1979, LB 65, § 16;

Laws 1980, LB 647, § 9;

Laws 1983, LB 396, § 5;

Laws 1984, LB 809, § 11;

Laws 1985, Second Spec. Sess., LB 6, § 7;

Laws 1986, LB 1258, § 7;

Laws 1987, LB 376A, § 12;

Laws 1989, LB 84, § 13;

Laws 1991, LB 9, § 6;

Laws 1991, LB 773, § 24;

Laws 1995, LB 133, § 4;

Laws 1996, LB 1039, § 8;

Laws 1997, LB 397, § 30;

Laws 2009, LB94, § 6;

Laws 2014, LB1087, § 15;

Laws 2018, LB1089, § 19.
January 1, 2019